Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Military service pension; retirement pay. new text begin (a)new text end To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, compensation received from a pension or other retirement pay from the federal government for service in the militarydeleted text begin , asdeleted text end new text begin is a subtraction. Only the following amounts may be subtracted under this subdivision:new text end new text begin (1) compensationnew text end computed under United States Code, title 10, sections 1401 to 1414, 1447 to 1455, and 12733deleted text begin , is a subtraction.deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) the total amount of a federal employee retirement system pension under United States Code, title 5, chapter 84, multiplied by the taxpayer's military service ratio; and new text end new text begin (3) the total amount of a civil service retirement system pension under United States Code, title 5, chapter 83, subchapter III, multiplied by the taxpayer's military service ratio. new text end new text begin (b) new text end The subtraction is limited to individuals who do not claim the credit under section 290.0677. new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "military service ratio" means: new text end new text begin (1) in the case of a federal employee retirement system pension, the years of service credited to the taxpayer for military service under United States Code, title 5, section 8411, divided by the total service credited to the taxpayer under that section; and new text end new text begin (2) in the case of a civil service retirement system pension, the years of service credited to the taxpayer for military service under United States Code, title 5, section 8322, divided by the total service credited to the taxpayer under that section. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of calculating the ratio under paragraph (b), the commissioner must consider the number of full years and months credited to the taxpayer, excluding any fractional part of a month, if any. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end